Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5390.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 451a. (1) Except as provided in section 248, a work project appropriation continues to be available until completion of the work or 48 months after the last day of the fiscal year in which the appropriation was originally made, whichever comes first, then the remaining balance lapses to the state fund from which it was appropriated. For work projects established before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the 48-month time period described in this subsection begins on the last day of the fiscal year in the year the amendatory act that added this section takes effect. To be designated as a work project, a work project shall must meet all of the following criteria: (a) The work project shall be Be for a specific purpose. (b) The work project shall contain Contain a specific plan to accomplish its objective. (c) The work project shall have Have an estimated completion cost. (d) The work project shall have Have an estimated completion date. (2) The director has the authority to may issue directives to lapse existing work project accounts at any time. The director shall notify each member of the senate and house appropriations committees and the fiscal agencies of work projects that the director has ordered to lapse. These directives may be disapproved by either Either of the senate or house appropriations committee within committees may disapprove a directive not later than 30 days after the date of the notification and, if disapproved within that time, shall the directive is not be effective. (3) Not later than 45 days after the conclusion of the fiscal year, the director shall notify the senate and house appropriations committees and the fiscal agencies of appropriations proposed to be designated as work projects in accordance with the definition contained in this act. These designations may be disapproved by either The appropriations committee within committees may disapprove a designation not later than 30 days after the date of the notification and, if disapproved within that time, shall the designation is not be effective. For a disapproval of a designation made under this subsection to be valid, each appropriations committee must hold a meeting at which the corresponding fiscal agency testifies regarding each designation that is being disapproved, including the amount of funds of each associated appropriation, and both appropriations committees must disapprove of the designation by a two-thirds majority vote. The notification shall must include an estimate of the dollar amount of the funds to be designated as work projects and a description of all work projects designated in an appropriations act. (4) Not later than 120 days after the conclusion of the fiscal year, the director shall prepare and deliver to the senate and house appropriations committees and the fiscal agencies a report that summarizes current work project accounts. This The report shall must contain a listing all of the following: (a) A list of all work project accounts. , the (b) The balance in each account. , the (c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously designated work projects. , and the (d) The funds that received these lapses.